Utah statutes.
41-12a-409.   Power to require proof of owner's or operator's security in
other form.
If, after a hearing, the department determines that a particular proof of
owner's or operator's security filed under this chapter no longer fulfills the
purposes for which it is required, the department shall require proof of
security in another permitted form.  Pending the filing of the other proof,
the department shall suspend the license and registration or the nonresident's
operating privilege.
